Utah statutes.
58-70a-306.   Temporary license.
(1)  An applicant for licensure as a physician assistant who has met all
qualifications for licensure except passing an examination component as
required in Section 58-70a-302, may apply for and be granted a temporary
license to practice under Subsection (2).
(2) (a)  The applicant shall submit to the division evidence of completion of
a physician assistant program as defined in Subsection 58-70a-302(4).
(b)  The temporary license shall be issued for a period ending on the earlier
of the date of the next succeeding physician assistant examination, if the
applicant does not take that examination, or ten days after the date
examination results of the next succeeding physician assistant examination are
available to those taking the examination.
(c)  A physician assistant holding a temporary license may work only under the
direct supervision of an approved supervising or substitute supervising
physician in accordance with a delegation of services agreement, and all
patient charts shall be reviewed and countersigned by the supervising or
substitute supervising physician.
